nb: Justeringsmetode for vevstolspenning: Feste med knytepinne; Automatisk/assistert stramming; Friksjonsbrems; Knott-/skruestramming; Spakestramming; Frivekt; Skralle og hake; Annet
en: Loom tension adjustment method: Apron rod tie-on; Automatic/assisted tensioning; Friction brake; Knob/screw tensioning; Lever tensioning; Live weight; Ratchet and pawl; Other
lt-LT: Audimo staklių įtempimo reguliavimo metodas: Pririšimas prie veleno strypo; Automatinis / pagalbinis įtempimas; Frikcinis stabdys; Rankenėlės / sraigto įtempimas; Svirties įtempimas; Gyvasis svoris; Reketėnas su spragtuku; Kita
vi: Phương pháp điều chỉnh độ căng khung dệt: Cột vào thanh cuộn; Căng tự động/hỗ trợ; Phanh ma sát; Căng bằng núm/ốc vít; Căng bằng đòn bẩy; Trọng lượng động; Bánh cóc và con cóc; Khác
da: Metode til justering af vævspænding: Fremknytning til kæpstok; Automatisk/assisteret spænding; Friktionsbremse; Drejeknap-/skruespænding; Håndtagsspænding; Aktiv vægt; Spærhage og pal; Andet
pt-PT: Método de ajuste da tensão do tear: Fixação com vareta de avanço; Tensão automática/assistida; Travão de fricção; Tensão por botão/parafuso; Tensão por alavanca; Peso vivo; Catraca e lingueta; Outro
es: Método de ajuste de tensión del telar: Amarre a la varilla del delantal; Tensión automática/asistida; Freno de fricción; Tensión por perilla/tornillo; Tensión por palanca; Peso vivo; Trinquete y traba; Otro
th: วิธีการปรับความตึงของเครื่องทอผ้า: ผูกแกนผ้าใบ; ปรับความตึงอัตโนมัติ/มีระบบช่วย; เบรกแรงเสียดทาน; ปรับความตึงด้วยลูกบิด/สกรู; ปรับความตึงด้วยคันโยก; ถ่วงน้ำหนักแขวนลอย; วงล้อและกระเดื่อง; อื่นๆ
hu: Szövőszék feszességállítási módszere: Kötényrúdra kötős; Automatikus / rásegítéses feszítő; Súrlódófék; Gombos / csavaros feszítő; Karos feszítő; Élősúlyos; Kilincsműves (racsnis); Egyéb
sk-SK: Spôsob nastavenia napätia tkáčskeho stavu: Priviazanie na pripínaciu tyč; Automatické/asistované napínanie; Trecou brzdou; Napínanie skrutkou/otočným gombíkom; Pákové napínanie; Živá záťaž (závažie); Západka a rohatka; Iné
cs: Metoda nastavení napětí tkalcovského stavu: Uchycení na pomocnou tyč; Automatické/asistované napínání; Třecí brzda; Napínání pomocí knoflíku / šroubu; Napínání pomocí páky; Živá váha; Ráčna a západka; Jiné
nl: Weefgetouw spanningsaanpassingsmethode: Aanbinden met schortlat; Automatisch/ondersteund spannen; Frictierem; Knop-/schroefspanning; Hendelspanning; Vrij gewicht; Ratel en pal; Anders
ko: 직기 장력 조절 방법: 에이프런 로드 타이온; 자동/보조 장력 조절; 마찰 브레이크; 노브/나사 장력 조절; 레버 장력 조절; 라이브 웨이트; 래칫 및 폴; 기타
sl-SI: Način nastavljanja napetosti na statvah: Privez na napenjalno palico; Samodejno/asistirano napenjanje; Torna zavora; Napenjanje z gumbom/vijakom; Napenjanje z ročico; Prosta utež; Raglja z zatičem; Drugo
de: Methode zur Einstellung der Webstuhlspannung: Anbinden an die Tuchbaumstange; Automatische/unterstützte Spannung; Reibungsbremse; Knauf-/Schraubenspannung; Hebelspannung; Zusatzgewicht; Sperrrad und Klinke; Sonstige
pt-BR: Tear método de ajuste de tensão: Amarração com vareta; Tensionamento automático/assistido; Freio de fricção; Tensionamento com botão/parafuso; Tensionamento com alavanca; Peso ativo; Catraca e lingueta; Outro
tr: Dokuma tezgahı çözgü gerginliği ayarlama yöntemi: Apron çubuğuna bağlamalı; Otomatik/destekli gerdirme; Sürtünme freni; Düğme/vida ile gerdirme; Kol ile gerdirme; Serbest ağırlık; Cırcır ve mandal; Diğer
sv: Metod för justering av vävstolsspänning: Knytkäpp; Automatisk/assisterad sträckning; Friktionsbroms; Vred-/skruvsträckning; Spaksträckning; Fri vikt; Spärrhake och kugghjul; Annat
fi: Kangaspuiden kireyden säätömenetelmä: Varpusolmintakiinnitys; Automaattinen/avustettu kiristys; Kitkajarru; Nuppi-/ruuvikiristys; Vipukiristys; Vapaa paino; Räikkä ja säppi; Muu
zh-TW: 織布機張力調整方式: 繫帶桿綁定; 自動/輔助張力調整; 摩擦煞車; 旋鈕/螺絲張力調整; 槓桿張力調整; 活重; 棘輪與棘爪; 其他
el: Μέθοδος ρύθμισης τάσης αργαλειού: Δέσιμο σε ράβδο ποδιάς; Αυτόματη/υποβοηθούμενη τάνυση; Φρένο τριβής; Τάνυση με διακόπτη/βίδα; Τάνυση με μοχλό; Ελεύθερο βάρος; Καστάνια και αναστολέας; Άλλο
bg-BG: Метод за регулиране на опъването на стана: Връзване към прът с престилка; Автоматично/подпомогнато опъване; Фрикционна спирачка; Опъване с копче/винт; Лостово опъване; Живо тегло (live weight); Тресчотка и палец; Други
hr-HR: Metoda podešavanja napetosti tkalačkog stana: Vezivanje na šipku (Apron rod); Automatsko / potpomognuto zatezanje; Tarna kočnica; Zatezanje vijkom/gumbom; Zatezanje polugom; Slobodni uteg; Zupčanik i zapinjač; Ostalo
pl: Metoda regulacji napięcia krosna: Wiązanie do drążka osnowowego; Automatyczne / wspomagane napinanie; Hamulec cierny; Napinanie pokrętłem/śrubą; Napinanie dźwignią; Obciążenie swobodne; Zapadka i koło zapadkowe; Inne
zh-CN: 织机张力调节方式: 卷轴杆绑扎; 自动/辅助张紧; 摩擦制动; 旋钮/螺钉张紧; 杠杆张紧; 重锤张力; 棘轮棘爪; 其他
ru: Способ регулировки натяжения ткацкого станка: Привязывание к прутку фартука; Автоматическое / вспомогательное натяжение; Фрикционный тормоз; Натяжение ручкой/винтом; Рычажное натяжение; Подвесной груз; Храповой механизм; Другое
fr: Mode de réglage de la tension du métier à tisser: Attache sur baguette; Tension automatique / assistée; Frein à friction; Tension par molette / vis; Tension par levier; Tension à poids; Roue à cliquet et cliquet; Autre
ro-RO: Metoda de reglare a tensiunii războiului de țesut: Legare pe tija de șorț; Tensionare automată/asistată; Frână cu fricțiune; Tensionare cu buton/șurub; Tensionare cu manetă; Greutate liberă; Clichet și opritor; Altele
it: Metodo di regolazione della tensione del telaio: Legatura alla bacchetta del subbio; Tensionamento automatico/assistito; Freno a frizione; Tensionamento a manopola/vite; Tensionamento a leva; Peso dinamico; Cricchetto e nottolino; Altro
ja: 織機張力調整方法: エプロンロッド・タイオン; 自動/補助テンション; フリクションブレーキ; ノブ/ネジ式テンション; レバー式テンション; ライブウェイト; ラチェット＆爪; その他